Utah statutes.
10-3-609.   Action on committee reports.

Final action on any report of any committee appointed by the governing body shall be deferred to the next regular meeting of the governing body on the request of any two members, except that the council in a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or a town may call a special meeting to consider final action.

